District of Columbia statutes.
31-3802

Repealed

Extent of coverage.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-33, § 3, 26 DCR 1116
May 21, 1992, D.C. Law 9-99, § 2(a), 39 DCR 2142
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 351, 52 DCR 2331
1981 Ed., § 35-1102.
1973 Ed., § 35-2002.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 306 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 306 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 351 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).